Tennessee statutes. Title 45 Banks And Financial Institutions
Part 4

General Powers and Duties

45-3-401. Required liquidity.

No association shall invest in any security, other than in liquid assets, or in any real estate or other loan at any time when its liquid assets are less than a minimum percentage of its deposit liability, which percentage shall be set by the commissioner.

Acts 1978, ch. 708, § 2.22; T.C.A., § 45-1422.

Compiler's Notes. For transfer of functions under this chapter from the department of commerce and insurance to the department of financial institutions, see Executive order No. 38 (February 11, 1983).

Cross-References. Negotiable instruments, title 47, ch. 3.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 22 Tenn. Juris., Savings and Loan Associations, § 8.

45-3-402. Regulation of loans and investments.

The commissioner shall, from time to time, promulgate rules and regulations in respect to all loans and investments authorized under this chapter that may be reasonably necessary to assure that the loans and investments are in keeping with sound lending practices and promote the purposes of this chapter.

Acts 1978, ch. 708, § 2.29; T.C.A., § 45-1429.

45-3-403. Right to act to avoid loss.

Nothing in this chapter or in the laws of this state shall be construed as denying to an association the right to invest its funds, operate its business, manage or deal in property, or take any other action over whatever period of time as may reasonably be necessary to avoid loss on a loan or investment theretofore made or an obligation created in good faith.

Acts 1978, ch. 708, § 2.32; T.C.A., § 45-1432.

45-3-404. Computation of net income.

Every association shall close its books on the last business day of its fiscal year, and at other times that its charter or bylaws provide, or as the commissioner requires, for the purpose of determining the gross income of the association for its fiscal year or for the period since the date of the last closing of its books, and from which shall be deducted the expenses of operating the association for that period, the balance remaining being the net income for the period.

Acts 1978, ch. 708, § 2.33; T.C.A., § 45-1433.

45-3-405. Reserves — Liquid assets.

Every association shall set up and maintain reserves for the purpose of absorbing losses and shall maintain such portion of its assets in cash and other liquid assets as required by the commissioner. If an association has obtained insurance of accounts by the federal savings and loan insurance corporation, or by any other insurer approved by the commissioner, any portion of the loss reserves of the association may be considered as constituting a portion of the insurance reserves required by the insurer and may be set up as an insurance reserve account on the books of the association.

Acts 1978, ch. 708, § 2.34; T.C.A., § 45-1434.

Compiler's Notes. The federal savings and loan insurance corporation, referred to in this section, was abolished, effective February 1, 1992. See the Historical and Statutory Notes under 12 U.S.C. § 1437.

45-3-406. Transfers to loss reserves.

If, at the date of any closing of its books, the loss reserves of an association equal an aggregate amount of a percentage as the commissioner may prescribe, then an amount necessary to increase its loss reserves to the required amount shall be transferred from the net income of the association to its loss reserves.

In the event that any credit to the loss reserves of an association is made following July 1, 1978, in excess of the minimum percentage required herein, the dollar amount of the excess may be carried over as a credit toward the minimum requirement for any subsequent accounting period.

Acts 1978, ch. 708, § 2.35; T.C.A., § 45-1435.

45-3-407. Dividends on capital stock.

In the case of a capital stock association, the balance of net income of the association, if any, after providing for all expenses of operation, allocation to loss reserves, and payment of interest, may be credited to a retained earnings or surplus account, from which the board of directors may, at its discretion, and at such times as it may determine, declare, and pay dividends in cash or additional stock to the holders of record of the stock outstanding at the date the dividends are declared.

Acts 1978, ch. 708, § 2.36; T.C.A., § 45-1436.